Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-1011
Violation; civil penalty.

Notwithstanding section 75-156, any private water company that violates any provision of the Water Service Regulation Act or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars nor more than one thousand dollars for each act of violation and for each day of violation to be recovered as provided in section 75-1012.

Laws 1994, LB 1002, § 11;

Laws 2008, LB755, § 4.